Montana, session 2025, HB442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 27-6-605, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-6-605. Decision to be filed and copies sent to parties, and attorneys, and licensing board.
The decision shall be communicated in writing to the parties and attorneys concerned, and a copy thereof shall
be retained in the permanent files of the panel. A copy of the decision shall be sent to the health care provider's
professional licensing board."
Section 2. Section 27-12-605, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-12-605. Decision to be filed and copies sent to parties, and attorneys, and licensing board.
A copy of the decision must be:
(1) given to the parties and their attorneys; and
(2) retained in the permanent files of the panel."
Section 3. Section 37-3-404, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-3-404. Immunity of person providing information. A person, organization, association, society,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 442
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 442
or health care facility which that in good faith provides information to the state board of medical examiners as
required by 37-3-401, 37-3-402, or 37-3-403 is not subject to suit for civil damages as a result thereof of
providing information."
Section 4. Section 37-3-405, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-3-405. Suspension of license or privilege for failure to report. The willful failure of any person,
organization, association, society, or health care facility to comply with 37-3-401, 37-3-402, or 37-3-403 is
grounds for suspension of any a license or privilege granted by the state of Montana. Upon such failure, the
The agency granting the license or privilege may, in its discretion, suspend the license or privilege for a period
not to exceed 1 month for a failure to comply."
Section 5. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is repealed:
37-3-402. Insurer to report to board.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 442
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 442, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 442
INTRODUCED BY V. MOORE
AN ACT REVISING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN PROFESSIONAL OCCUPATIONS;
ELIMINATING THE REQUIREMENT FOR THE MEDICAL LEGAL PANEL TO SEND A LICENSING BOARD
THE OUTCOME OF A DECISION; ELIMINATING THE REQUIREMENT FOR THE CHIROPRACTIC LEGAL
PANEL TO SEND THE LICENSING BOARD THE OUTCOME OF A DECISION; REMOVING THE
REQUIREMENT FOR AN INSURER TO REPORT TO THE BOARD OF MEDICAL EXAMINERS FOR ALLEGED
PROFESSIONAL NEGLIGENCE; AMENDING SECTIONS 27-6-605, 27-12-605, 37-3-404, AND 37-3-405, MCA;
AND REPEALING SECTION 37-3-402, MCA.